Colorado statutes. TITLE 17 Corrections
PART 4
PREPAROLE FACILITIES AND PROGRAMS

17-2-401 to 17-2-405. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part repealed, p. 31, § 10, effective March 20.

Editor's note:

This part 4 was added in 1990. For amendments to this part 4 prior to its repeal in 1997, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.